apertium-fin-swe.swe.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
! Irregular and strond verbs:
   vara:       V-vara-lex ;
   veta:v      V-veta-lex ;
  kunna:k      V-kunna-lex ;
 dricka:dr     V-dricka-lex ;
    äta:       V-äta-lex ;
     ha        V-ha-lex ;
     se:s      V-se-lex ;
     gå:g      V-gå-lex ;
     få:f      V-gå-lex ;
     ta:t      V-ta-lex ;
 komma:kom     V-komma-lex ;
  vilja:v      V-vilja-lex ;
 måsta:måst    V-måsta-lex ;
  göra:g       V-göra-lex ;
    tro	       V-tro-lex ;
  smyga:sm     V-smyga-lex ;
  sova:sov     V-sova-lex ;
  sitta:s      V-sitta-lex ;
   säga:s      V-säga-lex ;
 springa:spr   V-springa-lex ;
  höra:hör     V-höra-lex ;

gömma% sig%<vblex%>%<inf%>:gömma% sig # ;
gömma% sig%<vblex%>%<pres%>:gömmer% sig # ;
gömma% sig%<vblex%>%<past%>:gömde% sig # ;
gömma% sig%<vblex%>%<pp%>:gömt% sig # ;

! Regular verbs:
  tänka:tänk   V-er-lex ;
skratta:skratt V-ar-lex ;
   leka:lek    V-ar-lex ;
  hitta:hitt   V-ar-lex ;
  svara:svar   V-ar-lex ;
berätta:berätt V-ar-lex ;
   leta:let    V-ar-lex ;
  titta:titt   V-ar-lex ;
   tala:tal    V-ar-lex ;
  fråga:fråg   V-ar-lex ;
  räkna:räkn   V-ar-lex ;
  prata:prat   V-ar-lex ;
  älska:älsk   V-ar-lex ;
  gilla:gill   V-ar-lex ;
  kolla:koll   V-ar-lex ;
 lyssna:lyssn  V-ar-lex ;
  sluta:slut   V-ar-lex ;
  prova:prov   V-ar-lex ;
   kika:kik    V-ar-lex ;
tycka:tyck     V-er-lex ;

!===================!
 LEXICON Punctuation
!===================!


%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%’%<apos%>:%’ # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%»%<lquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%”%<lquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;
